Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1186.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Title 41, chapter 23, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-2505, to read: START_STATUTE41-2505. State contracts; request for proposals; governor; donations; disclosure Notwithstanding any other law, a company that currently has a state contract with any state agency or that responds to a request for proposals shall disclose anything of value that the company, its officers or directors or any of their family members have PROVIDED, DIRECTLY or indirectly, during the preceding five years to any of the following: 1. The governor. 2. any entity that is established, financed, maintained or controlled by the Governor or an agent of the Governor, including a campaign committee, a joint fundraising committee or an inaugural fund. 3. an entity that advocates for the election of the Governor or for the defeat of an electoral opponent of the Governor, including a political committee or other nonprofit organization that makes any independent expenditures. END_STATUTE Sec. 2.2. Section 41-2550, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-2550. Retention of procurement records; resolicitation of contracts A. All procurement records shall be retained and disposed of in accordance with records retention guidelines and schedules approved by the Arizona state library, archives and public records. B. A state agency or state employee may not destroy any notes taken during the evaluation of a company that responds to a request for proposals. If a state agency or state employee destroys any notes pursuant to this subsection, All contracts that were related to the destroyed notes and that were agreed to FROM AND AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS AMENDMENT TO THIS SECTION MAY be resolicited. END_STATUTE Sec. 3.3. Title 41, chapter 24, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-2707, to read: START_STATUTE41-2707. Grants; governor; donations; disclosure Notwithstanding any other law, a company that applies for a grant shall disclose anything of value that the company, its officers or directors or any of their family members have PROVIDED, DIRECTLY or indirectly, during the preceding five years to any of the following: 1. The governor. 2. any entity that is established, financed, maintained or controlled by the Governor or an agent of the Governor, including a campaign committee, a joint fundraising committee or an inaugural fund. 3. an entity that advocates for the election of the Governor or for the defeat of an electoral opponent of the Governor, including a political committee or other nonprofit organization that makes any independent expenditures. END_STATUTE